District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.09

Reporting.

(a)

The following individuals shall file with the Director of Campaign Finance, and with the principal campaign committee, if applicable, reports of receipts and expenditures on forms to be prescribed or approved by the Director of Campaign Finance:

(1)

The treasurer of each political committee;

(2)

The treasurer of each political action committee; and

(3)

The treasurer of each independent expenditure committee.

(b)

The reports required by subsection (a) of this section shall be filed on the 10th day of March, June, August, October, and December in the 7 months preceding the date on which, and in each year during which, an election is held for the office sought, and 8 days before an election, and also by the 31st day of January of each year. In addition, the reports shall be filed on the 31st day of July of each year in which there is no election. The reports shall be complete as of the date prescribed by the Director of Campaign Finance, which shall not be more than 5 days before the date of filing, except that any contribution of $200 or more received after the closing date prescribed by the Director of Campaign Finance for the last report required to be filed before the election shall be reported within 24 hours after its receipt.

(c)

Each report under this section shall disclose:

(1)

The amount of cash on hand at the beginning of the reporting period;

(2)

The full name and mailing address, including the occupation and the principal place of business, if any, of each person who has made one or more contributions to or for a committee or candidate, including the purchase of tickets for events such as dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar fundraising events, within the calendar year in an aggregate amount or value in excess of $50 or more, together with the amount and date of the contributions;

(2A)

For each contribution by a business contributor, any information provided by that business contributor in accordance with § 1-1163.13(b);

(3)

The total sum of individual contributions made to or for a committee or candidate during the reporting period and not reported under paragraph (2) of this subsection;

(4)

Each loan to or from any person within the calendar year in an aggregate amount or values of $50 or more, together with the full names and mailing addresses (including the occupation and the principal place of business, if any) of the lender and endorsers, if any, and the date and amount of the loans; and

(5)

The net amount of proceeds from:

(A)

The sale of tickets to each dinner, luncheon, rally, and other fundraising events organized by a committee;

(B)

Mass collections made at the events; and

(C)

Sales by a committee of items such as political campaign pins, buttons, badges, flags, emblems, hats, banners, literature, and similar materials;

(6)

Each contribution, rebate, refund, or other receipt of $50 or more not otherwise listed under paragraphs (2) through (5) of this subsection;

(7)

The total sum of all receipts by or for a committee or candidate during the reporting period;

(8)

The full name and mailing address (including the occupation and the principal place of business, if any) of each person to whom expenditures have been made by a committee or on behalf of a committee or candidate within the calendar year in an aggregate amount or value of $10 or more, the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure, and the name and address of, and office sought by, each candidate on whose behalf the expenditure was made;

(9)

The total sum of expenditures made by a committee or candidate during the calendar year;

(10)

The amount and nature of debts and obligations owed by or to the committee, in a form as the Director of Campaign Finance may prescribe, and a continuous reporting of its debts and obligations after the election when the Director of Campaign Finance may require until the debts and obligations are extinguished; and

(11)

Other information as may be required by the Director of Campaign Finance

(d)

The reports to be filed under subsection (a) of this section shall be cumulative during the calendar year to which they relate, but where there has been no change in an item reported in a previous report during the year, only the unchanged amount need be carried forward. If no contributions or expenditures have been accepted or expended during a calendar year, the treasurer of the committee or candidate shall file a statement to that effect.

(e)

(1)

A report or statement required by this part shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the person filing the report or statement.

(2)

The oath or affirmation required under this subsection shall be given under penalty of perjury and shall state that the filer has used all reasonable diligence in the preparation of the report or statement and the report or statement is true and complete to the best of the filer's knowledge.

(3)

An oath or affirmation by a candidate shall also state that the candidate has used all reasonable diligence to ensure that:

(A)

The candidate and the candidate's political committees are in compliance with this part; and

(B)

The candidate's political committees have advised their contributors of the obligations imposed on those contributors by this subchapter.

(4)

The Elections Board shall, by published regulations of general applicability, prescribe the manner in which contributions and expenditures in the nature of debts and other contracts, agreements, and promises to make contributions or expenditures shall be reported. The regulations shall provide that they be reported in separate schedules. In determining aggregate amounts of contributions and expenditures, amounts reported as provided in the regulations shall not be considered until actual payment is made.

(f)

Each political committee (including principal campaign, inaugural, transition, and exploratory committees) shall, in a separate schedule of its report to be filed under subsection (a) of this section, disclose the:

(1)

Name, address, and employer of each person reasonably known by the committee to have bundled in excess of $ 10,000 during the reporting period; and

(2)

For each person, the total of the bundling.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 309, 59 DCR 1862
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-79, § 2(i), 61 DCR 153

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.16, § 1-1001.17, § 1-1163.13, and § 1-1163.17.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-79 rewrote (a), (b) and (e); added (c)(2A); and added (f).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-79: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-79 provided that the act shall apply upon the latest of: (1) The inclusion of the fiscal effect of the act in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) January 31, 2015.

A certification dated February 4, 2015, that the fiscal effect of the Campaign Finance Reform and Transparency Amendment Act of 2013, D.C. Law 20-79, has been included in an approved budget and financial plan was published in the D.C. Register on March 13, 2015 (62 DCR 2988).